grammars/class.func.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
 rr rd rdd dj bb kk dd djdj
 ng rn rl rr nj
 [ADJ] [ADJ.loc] [ADJ.pred]
 @P.TYPE.N@ @R.TYPE.N@
 (ku) (rr) (r) (~~)
 
LEXICON Root
[PRON]:0 Pronouns ;
[PRON.rel]:0 RelPronouns ;
[PRON.refl]:0 ReflPronouns ;
[QUANT]:0 Quant ;
[PREP]:0 Prep ;
[PRON.poss]:0 PossPronouns ;
[PART]:0 Particles ;
[NEG]:0 NegationParticles ;
[LOC]:0 Locatives ;
[DEM.loc]:0 DemonstrativeLocatives ;
[DEM]:0 Demonstratives ;
[INTERJ]:0 Interjections ;
[IDEOPHONE]:0 Ideophones ;
[CONJ]:0 Conjunctions ;
0:0 Interrogatives ;

LEXICON Conjunctions
0:ba # ;
0:badbu # ;
0:bu # ;
0:dja # ;
0:la # ;
0:mak # ;
0:wanjh # ;
0:yika # ;
0:yikahwi # ;
0:yiman # ;

LEXICON Demonstratives 
0:bukka # ;
0:kunekke # ;
0:kunu # ;
0:makka # ;
0:manekke # ;
0:mani # ;
0:namekke # ;
0:ngalbu # ;

LEXICON DemonstrativeLocatives
0:kondah # ;
0:kamekke # ;

LEXICON Ideophones
0:dilh # ;
0:kurruwirluk # ;

LEXICON Interjections
0:aba # ;
0:adjuh # ;
0:awurd # ;
0:bawh # ;
0:bobo # ;
0:bonj # ;
0:burrkyak # ;
0:kab # ;
0:kah # ;
0:kare # ;
0:karrimen # ;
0:kayakki # ;
0:kek # ;
0:ken # ;
0:kornbayeng # ;
0:kub # ;
0:larrk # ;
0:ma # ;
0:med # ;
0:ngakukwarre # ;
0:ngamed # ;
0:nja # ;
0:njamed # ;
0:njonj # ;
0:nuk # ;
0:warddaw # ;
0:waw # ;
0:wurra # ;
0:ya # ;
0:yoh # ;
0:yowayh # ;

LEXICON Interrogatives
[INTERROG.what]:njale # ;
[INTERROG.why]:njalekenh # ;
[INTERROG.who.2sg]:yingale # ;
[INTERROG.which.III]:manngale # ;
[INTERROG.which.IV]:kunngale # ;
[INTERROG.which.I]:nangale # ;
[INTERROG.which.II]:ngalngale # ;

LEXICON Locatives
0:bewh # ;
0:kakbi # ;
0:karrikad # ;
0:kore # ;
0:koyek # ;
0:kuberrk # ;
0:kubodme # ;
0:kudjakku # ;
0:kudjarrirn # ;
0:kukadjid # ;
0:kukun # ;
0:kurih # ;
0:kurorre # ;
0:kururrk # ;
0:kuwardderurrk # ;
0:nabeh # ;
0:walem # ;

LEXICON NegationParticles
0:minj # ;
0:yuwn # ;

LEXICON Particles
0:djaying # ;
0:warrekah # ;
0:yimankek # ;

LEXICON Prep
0:dorrengh #;

LEXICON PossPronouns
0:kadberre # ;
0:karrewoneng # ;
0:ke # ;
0:ngadberre # ;
0:ngalengarre # ;
0:ngardduk # ;
0:ngarrku # ;
0:ngudberre # ;
0:ngudda # ;
0:ngurrewoneng # ;
0:nuye # ;

LEXICON Pronouns ! Unattached Pronouns
0:kuni # ;
0:baleh # ;
0:bedberre # ;
0:bedda # ;
0:bedman # ;
0:berrewoneng # ;
0:nahni # ;
0:nakka # ;
0:ngad # ;
0:ngalekke # ;
0:ngaleng # ;
0:ngali # ;
0:ngalkka # ;
0:ngaye # ;
0:ngudda # ;
0:njale # ;
0:njalehnjale # ;
0:nungan # ;
0:nungka # ;

LEXICON Quant
0:moken # ;

LEXICON ReflPronouns
0:ngadman # ;
0:ngalengman # ;
0:ngayeman # ;
0:ngudman # ;
0:yingan # ;

LEXICON RelPronouns ! relative pronouns
0:kunubewu # ;
0:manbu # ;
0:nawu # ;
